Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1078.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5306.2(a) introductory paragraph of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5306.2. Uniform 911 surcharge.(a) Surcharge imposed.--[Each] Except as provided under subsection (a.1), each subscriber or consumer shall pay a surcharge of $1.65 for each 911 communications service or prepaid wireless device for which that subscriber or consumer is billed by a provider or seller as provided for under this chapter. The surcharge shall be collected apart from and in addition to a fee levied by the provider or seller, in whole or in part, for the provision of 911 services. The surcharge shall be subject to the following:12345678910111213141516171819 * * *(a.1) Rate.-- Beginning on the effective date of this subsection until February 1, 2029, the surcharge under subsection (a) shall be $1.95. * * *Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the amendment or addition of 35 Pa.C.S. § 5306.2(a) and (a.1).(2) Article I-K of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is repealed.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1078PN1277 - 2 - 123456789101112